Massachusetts, session 194th, S1341.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9N of chapter 23 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
(a) There shall be in the department of unemployment assistance, but not subject to the
control of the director of unemployment assistance, a state advisory council of 7 members
appointed by the governor, including at least 1 member from each list of nominees submitted by
the following organizations: the Massachusetts AFL–CIO, the Massachusetts Building Trades
Council, and the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation. Two members shall be persons
who, because of their vocations, employments, occupations or affiliations, can be classed as
employers. The governor shall from time to time designate one of the members as chairman. Of
of 2

the members originally appointed, 2 members shall be chosen for a term of 4 years, and the
remaining members shall be chosen for a term of 6 years; and thereafter as their terms expire the
governor shall appoint members for terms of 6 years. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment
by the governor, with like advice and consent, for the remainder of the unexpired term, except
that if the governor fails to fill such vacancy within 60 days after such vacancy exists, such
vacancy shall be filled forthwith by a majority vote of all the remaining members of the advisory
council for the remainder of the unexpired term. All members shall serve until the qualification
of their respective successors. The council shall meet at least 6 times a year. Each of the
members of the council shall receive the sum of $100 as compensation for each day's attendance
at meetings of the council; provided, that the total amount paid hereunder to any such member
shall not exceed $3,000 in any calendar year. Members of the council shall receive their traveling
and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The director of
unemployment assistance shall provide for the council suitable meeting quarters and such
clerical and other assistance as the council may deem necessary. Said offices and the incumbents
thereof shall not be subject to chapter 31 and the rules and regulations made thereunder.
SECTION 2. Said section 9N of said chapter 23 is hereby further amended by inserting
after the last paragraph the following paragraph:-
(c) The state advisory council shall be subject to sections 18 through 25, inclusive, of
chapter 30A of the general laws.
SECTION 3. Section 62 of chapter 151A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 28, the words “commerce and labor”, and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- labor and workforce development
of 2